apertium-ina.ina-CLEAN.dix
    <pardef n="pot/er__vbmod">
      <e><p><l></l><r>er<s n="vbmod"/></r></p><par n="er-verbs"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/haber__vbhaver">
      <e><p><l></l><r>haber<s n="vbhaver"/></r></p><par n="/haber"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/haber__vblex">
      <e><p><l></l><r>haber<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="/haber"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/esser__vblex"> <!-- esser vblex in some languages: estar -->
      <e><p><l></l><r>esser<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="/esser"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/esser__vbser">
      <e><p><l></l><r>esser<s n="vbser"/></r></p><par n="/esser"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- END - Verbs - Paradigms -->


    <!-- Punctuation & special - Paradigms -->
    <pardef n="coma">
      <e><re>,</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="cm"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="emails">
      <e><re>[a-z.]+@[a-z.]+</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="urls">
      <e><re>(http://|https://|ftp://)?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9](([\-_])?[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9])*)*(.[a-z][a-z]|.aero|.asia|.biz|.cat|.com|.coop|.edu|.gov|.info|.int|.jobs|.mil|.mobi|.museum|.name|.net|.org|.pro|.tel|.travel)(/([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*/)*([áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+(.[áéíóúàèìòùäëïöüñça-z0-9\-_\?=&amp;\*,]+)*)?)?</re><!--      <re>(((www.)|(http://))[a-z0-9\-]+([.][a-z]+)+(/[a-z0-9_]+)*([.][a-z]+)*)</re> --><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="horas">
      <e><re>[0-2]?[0-9]h[0-6][0-9]</re><p><l/><r><s n="num"/><s n="hour"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="numeros">
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?%</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
      <e><re>[\+\-]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?[ ]?\-[ ]?[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?([ ]?%)?</re><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="percent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pardret">
      <e><re>[\)\]]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="rpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e><re>[\(\[]</re><p><l></l>  <r><s n="lpar"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separ">
      <e><re>¿</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="lquest"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="separa">
      <e r="LR"><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l><a/></l>      <r></r></p><re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l><r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <!-- END - Punctuation & special - Paradigms -->

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="esser"><i></i><par n="/esser__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="haber"><i></i><par n="/haber__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="haber"><i></i><par n="/haber__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="deber"><i>deb</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="poter"><i>pot</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="soler"><i>sol</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="voler"><i>vol</i><par n="pot/er__vbmod"/></e>
      <e><par n="coma"/></e>
      <e><par n="numeros"/></e>
      <e><par n="pardret"/></e>
      <e><par n="paresq"/></e>
      <e><par n="separ"/></e>
      <e><par n="separa"/></e>
      <e><par n="emails"/></e>
      <e><par n="urls"/></e>
      <e><par n="horas"/></e>
